Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.885

Scrap metal no-buy list database program.

(1) Beginning on July 1, 2014, to the extent funds are appropriated, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall implement and operate an ongoing electronic statewide no-buy list database program.

(2) The database must be made available on a secured network or website.

(3) The no-buy list database program shall allow for any scrap metal business to enter a customer's name and date of birth into the database. The database must determine if the customer pursuing the transaction with the scrap metal business has been convicted in Washington of any crime involving burglary, robbery, theft, or possession of or receiving stolen property within the past four years.

(4) If the customer has been convicted of any crime involving burglary, robbery, theft, or possession of or receiving stolen property within the past four years despite whether the person was acting in his or her own behalf or as the agent of another then, at a minimum, the no-buy list database program must immediately send an alert to the scrap metal business stating: (a) That the customer is listed on a current no-buy list, (b) the four-year expiration period for the customer's most recent crime listed, and (c) a notification that entering into a transaction with the customer is prohibited under RCW 9A.56.410.

(5) The database shall also include individuals who have attempted to purchase or sell unlawfully obtained metals at licensed scrap metal recyclers and individuals who attempt to conduct a transaction while under the influence of controlled substances.

(6) Local jurisdictions applying for grants under RCW 36.28A.240 must provide updates to the no-buy list database annually and 120 days after a grant is distributed.

[ 2022 c 221 s 9; 2013 c 322 s 31.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2022 c 221: See notes following RCW 19.290.020.